Massachusetts, session 194th, H2633.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 18D the
following section:-
Section 18D½. (a) The department shall create, in consultation with organizations
representing the mobility, hearing, speech and sight impaired communities, and publish on its
website a statewide disability indicator form which a person may complete and submit to the
department to notify primary and regional PSAP of certain disabilities. The disability indicator
form shall be available to subscribers of a wireless carrier, a wireline carrier or a prepaid wireless
telephone service. The disability indicator form shall be written in clear language that is
comprehensible to a person proficient in English at the fifth grade level and accessible to persons
with visual disabilities. In any place, where 5 per cent of citizens of the commonwealth speak a
of 2

language other than English as determined by the most recent American Community Survey of
the United States Census Bureau, the disability indicator form shall be translated into that
language.
The disability indicator form shall include space for the person to identify any mental
health needs, intellectual and developmental disabilities, complex medical needs or neurological
impairments, including, but not limited to: (i) the person has equipment required to sustain the
person’s life; (ii) the person is bedridden, a wheelchair user or has another mobility impairment;
(iii) the person is legally blind; (iv) the person is deaf or hard of hearing; (v) communication via
the phone may be by TTY; (vi) the person has a speech impairment; (vii) the person is
cognitively impaired; (viii) the person has a service animal; (ix) the person requires translation
services; or (x) any potential triggers for first responders to be aware of. The disability indicator
form shall also include a space for a person to remove or change any disability indicators.
(b) The department, in consultation with organizations representing the mobility, hearing,
speech and sight impaired communities, shall annually review the contents of the disability
indicator form and amend the disability indicator form when needed, as determined by the
department.
of 2